New York, session 2025-2026, S7670.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 24 of section 501 of the 2 retirement and social security law, as amended by chapter 368 of the 3 laws of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) [(i)] The "overtime ceiling" shall mean fifteen thousand dollars 5 per annum on January first, two thousand ten, and shall be increased by 6 three percent each year thereafter, provided, however, that [for]: 7 (i) For members who first become members of the New York state and 8 local employees' retirement system on or after April first, two thousand 9 twelve, "overtime ceiling" shall mean fifteen thousand dollars per annum 10 on April first, two thousand twelve, and shall be increased each year 11 thereafter by a percentage to be determined annually by reference to the 12 consumer price index (all urban consumers, CPI-U, U.S. city average, all 13 items, 1982-84=100), published by the United States bureau of labor 14 statistics, for each applicable calendar year. Said percentage shall 15 equal the annual inflation as determined from the increase in the 16 consumer price index in the one year period ending on the December thir- 17 ty-first preceding the overtime ceiling adjustment effective on the 18 ensuing April first. 19 (ii) Commencing January first, two thousand eighteen, and each year 20 thereafter, the overtime ceiling percentage shall be increased by an 21 amount equal to the annual inflation as determined from the increase in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11208-05-6 S. 7670--A 2 1 the consumer price index in the one year period ending on the September 2 thirtieth prior to the overtime ceiling adjustment effective on the 3 ensuing January first. 4 (iii) Commencing January first, two thousand twenty-seven, and each 5 year thereafter, for members who first become members of the New York 6 state and local employees' retirement system on or after April first, 7 two thousand twelve, the overtime ceiling percentage increase shall be 8 equal to the greater of: (A) three percent, or (B) the annual inflation 9 as determined from the increase in the consumer price index in the one 10 year period ending on the September thirtieth prior to the overtime 11 ceiling adjustment effective on the ensuing January first. 12 § 2. Paragraph (c) of subdivision l of section 601 of the retirement 13 and social security law, as amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2017, 14 is amended to read as follows: 15 (c) The "overtime ceiling" shall mean fifteen thousand dollars per 16 annum on January first, two thousand ten, and shall be increased by 17 three [per cent] percent each year thereafter, provided, however, that: 18 (i) [for] For members who first become members of a public retirement 19 system of the state on or after April first, two thousand twelve, "over- 20 time ceiling" shall mean fifteen thousand dollars per annum on April 21 first, two thousand twelve, and shall be increased each year thereafter 22 by a percentage to be determined annually by reference to the consumer 23 price index (all urban consumers, CPI-U, U.S. city average, all items, 24 1982-84=100), published by the United States bureau of labor statistics, 25 for each applicable calendar year. Said percentage shall equal the annu- 26 al inflation as determined from the increase in the consumer price index 27 in the one year period ending on the December thirty-first preceding the 28 overtime ceiling adjustment effective on the ensuing April first. 29 (ii) Commencing January first, two thousand eighteen, and each year 30 thereafter, the overtime ceiling percentage shall be increased by an 31 amount equal to the annual inflation as determined from the increase in 32 the consumer price index in the one year period ending on the September 33 thirtieth prior to the overtime ceiling adjustment effective on the 34 ensuing January first. 35 (iii) Commencing January first, two thousand twenty-seven, and each 36 year thereafter, for members who first become members of the New York 37 state and local employees' retirement system on or after April first, 38 two thousand twelve, the overtime ceiling percentage increase shall be 39 equal to the greater of: (A) three percent, or (B) the annual inflation 40 as determined from the increase in the consumer price index in the one 41 year period ending on the September thirtieth prior to the overtime 42 ceiling adjustment effective on the ensuing January first. 43 § 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, none of the 44 provisions of this act shall be subject to the appropriation requirement 45 of section twenty-five of the retirement and social security law. 46 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would change the overtime ceiling percentage increase for Tier 6 members in the New York State and Local Employees' Retirement System (NYSLERS) to the greater of three percent and the rate of annual inflation, beginning January 1, 2027. Under current law, the ceiling was set at $15,000 at the inception of Tier 6 and is increased annually by the rate of inflation. Insofar as this bill affects NYSLERS, the present value of benefits would increase by approximately $400 million. S. 7670--A 3 NYSLERS Increase in present Increase in required value of benefits contributions Actives Tiers 1-5 (Closed) $ 0 mn $ 60 mn Actives Tier 6 (Open) $ 400 mn $ 340 mn Total $ 400 mn $ 400 mn Benefit improvements will be funded by increasing the billing rates charged annually. The annual contribution required of all participating employers in NYSLERS would increase 0.1% of billable salary, or approxi- mately $14 million to the state of New York and approximately $21 million to the local participating employers. This permanent annual cost will vary in future billing cycles with changes in the billing rate and salary of the affected members. These estimated costs are based on 313,124 affected Tier 6 members, with annual salary of approximately $17 billion as of March 31, 2025. To develop the above costs, our models included a Monte Carlo analysis consisting of 5,000 simulations, each consisting of thirty years of annual CPI-U projections. In all 5,000 simulations, for at least one year in the thirty-year period, the 3% floor provided by the proposed legislation resulted in a higher overtime ceiling. The 3% floor exceeded annual inflation projections in approximately 70% of the 150,000 trial years. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated January 5, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-22. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.